Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1416.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 3725. Interference with operation or movement of a public transit vehicle.(a) Offense defined.--A person is guilty of interference with the operation or movement of a public transit vehicle if the person:(1) Attempts to cause or intentionally, knowingly or recklessly causes serious bodily injury or death to an operator while in the performance of duty.(2) Attempts to cause or intentionally or knowingly 123456789101112131415161718 causes bodily injury to an operator while in the performance of duty.(3) Intentionally interferes with an operator while in the performance of duty that results in serious bodily injury or death of another person.(4) Intentionally, knowingly or recklessly interferes with an operator while in the performance of duty that results in bodily injury of another person.(5) Attempts by physical menace to put an operator, while in the performance of the operator's duty, in fear of imminent serious bodily injury or death.(b) Grading.--(1) A person who violates subsection (a)(1) commits a felony of the first degree.(2) A person who violates subsection (a)(2), (3) or (5) commits a felony of the third degree.(3) A person who violates subsection (a)(4) commits a misdemeanor of the second degree.(c) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Operator." A driver, conductor, operations staff or engineer on board the public transit vehicle."Public transit vehicle." A bus, mass transit vehicle, commuter rail passenger transportation, as that term is defined under 49 U.S.C. § 24102 (relating to definitions), incline, light rail, monorail, railroad passenger car, streetcar, subway, train, trolley and a similar vehicle or system for the exclusive use of public transportation.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1416PN1642 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930